tools/dpl/test-hr_HR.aff
FLAG long
SFX DK Y 9
SFX DK 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX DK ar ra .	+GAjd 
SFX DK ar ru .	+DLjd 
SFX DK ar re .	+Vjd 
SFX DK ar rom .	+Ijd 
SFX DK ar rovi .	+NVmn 
SFX DK ar rova .	+Gmn 
SFX DK ar rovima .	+DLImn 
SFX DK ar rove .	+Amn 

SFX DL Y 9
SFX DL 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX DL ar ra .	+Gjd 
SFX DL ar ru .	+DLjd 
SFX DL ar re .	+Vjd 
SFX DL ar rom .	+Ijd 
SFX DL ar rovi .	+NVmn 
SFX DL ar ova .	+Gmn 
SFX DL ar ovima .	+DLImn 
SFX DL ar ove .	+Amn 

SFX DM Y 9
SFX DM 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX DM 0 a .	+GAjd 
SFX DM 0 u .	+DLjd 
SFX DM k če .	+Vjd 
SFX DM 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX DM 0 ovi .	+NVmn 
SFX DM 0 ova .	+Gmn 
SFX DM 0 ovima .	+DLImn 
SFX DM 0 ove .	+Amn 

SFX DN Y 8
SFX DN 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX DN ak ka .	+GjdGmn 
SFX DN ak ku .	+DLjd 
SFX DN tak če .	+Vjd 
SFX DN ak ci .	+NVmn 
SFX DN 0 a .	+Gmn 
SFX DN ak cima .	+DLImn 
SFX DN ak ke .	+Amn 

SFX DO Y 9
SFX DO 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX DO dak tka .	+Gjd 
SFX DO dak tku .	+DLVjd 
SFX DO dak če .	+Vjd 
SFX DO dak tkom .	+Ijd 
SFX DO ak ci .	+NVmn 
SFX DO 0 a .	+Gmn 
SFX DO ak cima .	+DLImn 
SFX DO dak tke .	+Amn 

SFX DP Y 9
SFX DP 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX DP am ma .	+Gjd 
SFX DP am mu .	+DLjd 
SFX DP am me .	+Vjd 
SFX DP am mom .	+Ijd 
SFX DP am movi .	+NVjd 
SFX DP am mova .	+Gmn 
SFX DP am movima .	+DLImn 
SFX DP am move .	+Amn 

SFX DQ Y 9
SFX DQ 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX DQ 0 a .	+GjdGmn 
SFX DQ 0 u .	+DLjd 
SFX DQ 0 e .	+Vjd 
SFX DQ 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX DQ 0 i .	+NVjd 
SFX DQ 0 a .	+Gmn 
SFX DQ 0 ima .	+DLImn 
SFX DQ 0 e .	+Amn 

SFX DR Y 11
SFX DR 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX DR 0 a .	+Gjd 
SFX DR 0 u .	+DLjd 
SFX DR ak če .	+Vjd 
SFX DR 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX DR 0 i .	+NVmn 
SFX DR 0 ova .	+Gmn 
SFX DR 0 ima .	+DLImn 
SFX DR 0 ove .	+Amn 
SFX DR 0 a .	+GjdGmn 
SFX DR 0 e .	+VjdAmn 

SFX DS Y 9
SFX DS 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX DS bac pca .	+GAjd 
SFX DS bac pcu .	+DLjd 
SFX DS bac pče .	+Vjd 
SFX DS bac pcem .	+Ijd 
SFX DS bac pci .	+NVmn 
SFX DS 0 a .	+Gmn 
SFX DS bac pcima .	+DLImn 
SFX DS bac pce .	+Amn 

SFX DT Y 5
SFX DT 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX DT ar ra .	+GAjd 
SFX DT ar ru .	+DLjd 
SFX DT ar re .	+Vjd 
SFX DT ar rom .	+Ijd 

SFX DU Y 9
SFX DU 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX DU ar ra .	+Gjd 
SFX DU ar ru .	+DLjd 
SFX DU ar re .	+Vjd 
SFX DU ar rom .	+Ijd 
SFX DU ar ri .	+NVmn 
SFX DU 0 a .	+Gmn 
SFX DU ar rima .	+DLImn 
SFX DU ar re .	+Amn 

SFX DV Y 7
SFX DV 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX DV 0 a .	+GAjdGmn 
SFX DV 0 u .	+DLVjd 
SFX DV 0 e .	+VjdAmn 
SFX DV 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX DV 0 i .	+NVmn 
SFX DV 0 ima .	+DLImn 

SFX DW Y 8
SFX DW 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX DW ar ra .	+Gjd 
SFX DW ar ru .	+DLjd 
SFX DW ar re .	+VjdAmn 
SFX DW ar rom .	+Ijd 
SFX DW ar ri .	+NVmn 
SFX DW 0 a .	+Gmn 
SFX DW ar rima .	+DLImn 

SFX DX Y 5
SFX DX 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX DX ar ra .	+Gjd 
SFX DX ar ru .	+DLjd 
SFX DX ar re .	+Vjd 
SFX DX ar rom .	+Ijd 

SFX DY Y 7
SFX DY 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX DY 0 a .	+GAjd 
SFX DY 0 u .	+DLmn 
SFX DY 0 e .	+VjdAmn 
SFX DY 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX DY 0 i .	+NVmn 
SFX DY 0 ima .	+DLImn 

SFX DZ Y 8
SFX DZ 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX DZ am ma .	+Gjd 
SFX DZ am mu .	+DLjd 
SFX DZ am me .	+VjdAmn 
SFX DZ am mom .	+Ijd 
SFX DZ am mi .	+NVmn 
SFX DZ 0 a .	+Gmn 
SFX DZ am mima .	+DLImn 

SFX EA Y 8
SFX EA 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX EA am ma .	+Gjd 
SFX EA am mu .	+DLjd 
SFX EA am me .	+VjdAmn 
SFX EA am mom .	+Ijd 
SFX EA am mi .	+NVmn 
SFX EA 0 a .	+Gmn 
SFX EA am mima .	+DLImn 

SFX EB Y 7
SFX EB 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX EB 0 a .	+GAjdGmn 
SFX EB 0 u .	+DLVjd 
SFX EB 0 em .	+Ijd 
SFX EB 0 i .	+NVmn 
SFX EB 0 ima .	+DLImn 
SFX EB 0 e .	+Amn 

SFX EC Y 8
SFX EC 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX EC 0 a .	+GAjdGmn 
SFX EC k če .	+Vjd 
SFX EC 0 u .	+DLjd 
SFX EC 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX EC k ci .	+NVmn 
SFX EC k cima .	+DLImn 
SFX EC 0 e .	+Amn 

SFX ED Y 9
SFX ED 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX ED ak ka .	+Gjd 
SFX ED ak ku .	+DLjd 
SFX ED tak če .	+Vjd 
SFX ED ak kom .	+Ijd 
SFX ED ak ci .	+NVmn 
SFX ED 0 a .	+Gmn 
SFX ED ak cima .	+DLImn 
SFX ED ak ke .	+Amn 

SFX EE Y 9
SFX EE 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX EE ak ka .	+Gjd 
SFX EE ak ku .	+DLjd 
SFX EE ak ku .	+Vjd 
SFX EE ak kom .	+Ijd 
SFX EE ak ci .	+NVmn 
SFX EE 0 a .	+Gmn 
SFX EE ak cima .	+DLImn 
SFX EE ak ke .	+Amn 

SFX EF Y 9
SFX EF 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX EF 0 a .	+Gjd 
SFX EF 0 u .	+DLVjd 
SFX EF sk šče .	+Vjd 
SFX EF 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX EF 0 ovi .	+NVmn 
SFX EF 0 ova .	+Gmn 
SFX EF 0 ovima .	+DLImn 
SFX EF 0 ove .	+Amn 

SFX EG Y 7
SFX EG 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX EG o la .	+GAjdGmn 
SFX EG o lu .	+DLjd 
SFX EG o le .	+VjdAmn 
SFX EG o lom .	+Ijd 
SFX EG o li .	+NVmn 
SFX EG o lima .	+DLImn 

SFX EH Y 9
SFX EH 0 0 .	+Najd 
SFX EH ao la .	+Gjd 
SFX EH ao lu .	+DLjd 
SFX EH ao le .	+Vjd 
SFX EH ao lom .	+Ijd 
SFX EH ao lovi .	+NVmn 
SFX EH ao lova .	+Gmn 
SFX EH ao lovima .	+DLImn 
SFX EH ao love .	+Amn 

SFX EI Y 9
SFX EI 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX EI ao la .	+Gjd 
SFX EI ao lu .	+DLjd 
SFX EI ao le .	+Vjd 
SFX EI ao lom .	+Ijd 
SFX EI ao lovi .	+NVmn 
SFX EI ao lova .	+Gmn 
SFX EI ao lovima .	+DLImn 
SFX EI ao love .	+Amn 

SFX EJ Y 9
SFX EJ 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX EJ el la .	+Gjd 
SFX EJ el lu .	+DLjd 
SFX EJ el le .	+Vjd 
SFX EJ el lom .	+Ijd 
SFX EJ el lovi .	+NVmn 
SFX EJ el lova .	+Gmn 
SFX EJ el lovima .	+DLImn 
SFX EJ el love .	+Amn 

SFX EK Y 9
SFX EK 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX EK o la .	+Gjd 
SFX EK o lu .	+DLjd 
SFX EK o le .	+Vjd 
SFX EK o lom .	+Ijd 
SFX EK o lovi .	+NVmn 
SFX EK o lova .	+Gmn 
SFX EK o lovima .	+DLImn 
SFX EK o love .	+Amn 

SFX EL Y 9
SFX EL 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX EL lac oca .	+GAjd 
SFX EL lac ocu .	+DLjd 
SFX EL lac oče .	+Vjd 
SFX EL lac ocem .	+Ijd 
SFX EL lac oci .	+NVmn 
SFX EL 0 a .	+Gmn 
SFX EL lac ocima .	+DLImn 
SFX EL lac oce .	+Amn 

SFX EM Y 9
SFX EM 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX EM ac ca .	+GAjd 
SFX EM ac cu .	+DLjd 
SFX EM sac šče .	+Vjd 
SFX EM ac cem .	+Ijd 
SFX EM ac ci .	+NVmn 
SFX EM 0 a .	+Gmn 
SFX EM ac cima .	+DLImn 
SFX EM ac ce .	+Amn 

SFX EN Y 5
SFX EN 0 0 .	+NAVjd 
SFX EN o a .	+GAVjdNGAVmn 
SFX EN o u .	+DLjd 
SFX EN 0 m .	+Ijd 
SFX EN o ima .	+DLImn 

SFX EO Y 8
SFX EO 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX EO ao la .	+Gjd 
SFX EO ao lu .	+DLjd 
SFX EO ao lom .	+Ijd 
SFX EO ao lovi .	+NVmn 
SFX EO ao lova .	+Gmn 
SFX EO ao lovima .	+DLImn 
SFX EO ao love .	+Amn 

SFX EP Y 9
SFX EP 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX EP 0 a .	+GAjd 
SFX EP 0 u .	+DLjd 
SFX EP 0 e .	+Vjd 
SFX EP 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX EP 0 i .	+NVmn 
SFX EP t ata .	+Gmn 
SFX EP 0 ima .	+DLI 
SFX EP 0 e .	+Amn 

SFX EQ Y 9
SFX EQ 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX EQ bat pta .	+Gjd 
SFX EQ bat ptu .	+DLjd 
SFX EQ bat pte .	+VjdAmn 
SFX EQ bat ptom .	+Ijd 
SFX EQ bat ptova .	+NVmn 
SFX EQ bat ptova .	+Gmn 
SFX EQ bat ptovima .	+DLImn 
SFX EQ bat ptove .	+Amn 

SFX ER Y 8
SFX ER 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX ER dak tka .	+Gjd 
SFX ER dak tku .	+DLVjd 
SFX ER dak če .	+Vjd 
SFX ER ak ci .	+NVmn 
SFX ER 0 a .	+Gmn 
SFX ER ak cima .	+DLImn 
SFX ER dak tke .	+Amn 

SFX ES Y 9
SFX ES 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX ES zac sca .	+Gjd 
SFX ES zac scu .	+DLjd 
SFX ES zac šče .	+Vjd 
SFX ES zac scem .	+Ijd 
SFX ES zac sci .	+NVmn 
SFX ES 0 a .	+Gmn 
SFX ES zac scima .	+DLImn 
SFX ES zac sce .	+Amn 

SFX ET Y 9
SFX ET 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX ET žac sca .	+GAjd 
SFX ET žac šcu .	+DLjd 
SFX ET žac šče .	+Vjd 
SFX ET žac šcem .	+Ijd 
SFX ET žac šci .	+NVmn 
SFX ET 0 a .	+Gjd 
SFX ET žac šcima .	+DLImn 
SFX ET žac šce .	+Amn 

SFX EU Y 7
SFX EU 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX EU 0 a .	+GjdGmn 
SFX EU 0 u .	+DLjd 
SFX EU 0 e .	+VjdAmn 
SFX EU 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX EU 0 i .	+NVjd 
SFX EU 0 ima .	+DLImn 

SFX EV Y 8
SFX EV 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX EV 0 a .	+GjdGmn 
SFX EV 0 u .	+DLVjd 
SFX EV 0 e .	+Vjd 
SFX EV 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX EV 0 i .	+NVmn 
SFX EV s asa .	+Gmn 
SFX EV 0 ima .	+DLImn 

SFX EW Y 8
SFX EW 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX EW as sa .	+GAjd 
SFX EW as su .	+DLVjd 
SFX EW as som .	+Ijd 
SFX EW as si .	+NVmn 
SFX EW 0 a .	+Gmn 
SFX EW as sima .	+DLImn 
SFX EW as se .	+Amn 

SFX EX Y 8
SFX EX 0 0 .	+Njd 
SFX EX 0 a .	+GAjdGmn 
SFX EX 0 u .	+DLjd 
SFX EX k če .	+Vjd 
SFX EX 0 kom .	+Ijd 
SFX EX k ci .	+NVmn 
SFX EX k cima .	+DLImn 
SFX EX 0 e .	+Amn 

SFX EY Y 8
SFX EY 0 0 .	+NAjd 
SFX EY 0 a .	+Gjd 
SFX EY 0 u .	+DLjd 
SFX EY 0 e .	+Vjd 
SFX EY 0 om .	+Ijd 
SFX EY 0 ovi .	+NGVmn 
SFX EY 0 ovima .	+DLImn 
SFX EY 0 ove .	+Amn 
