tools/dpl/test-hr_HR.dic
adolescent/EP
akademik/EC
Aleksandar/DT
altimetar/DU
anđeo/EG
apsolutizam/DZ
asketizam/DZ
ateizam/EA
biokemičar/DV
bitak/ED
branitelj/EB
bronh/EU
centar/DW
centimetar/DW
Cipar/DX
dadaizam/EA
dašak/EE
disk/EF
gledalac/EL
gledatelj/EB
hrbat/EQ
kabao/EI
kabel/EJ
keks/EV
konj/EB
kotao/EH
lažac/ET
nositelj/EB
obrazac/ES
pas/EW
posao/EI
prosac/EM
redak/ER
saldo/EN
sat/EY
smisao/EO
turist/DY
učitelj/EB
veo/EK
vepar/DK
vjetar/DL
vojnik/EX
vuk/DM
zadak/DO
zadatak/DN
zajam/DP
zakon/DQ
zub/DR
žabac/DS
žetelac/EL
